Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1520.01
Township counties without county road unit system; road districts; creation.

The county board under township organization in counties not operating under the county road unit system shall divide the county, except the portion occupied by the cities and incorporated villages, into as many road districts as may be necessary, and alter the boundaries thereof as may seem proper; Provided, in no case shall any road district be so constituted as to be within the limits of two distinct voting precincts or townships.

Laws 1959, c. 181, § 11, p. 658;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 19.

For road districts in commissioner counties having seven or more commissioners, see section 39-1637.